Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF886.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.06, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Application format and requirements. Every application for a Minnesota identification card, including an enhanced identification card, or for a driver's license, including an instruction permit, a provisional license, a noncompliant driver's license, a REAL ID driver's license, and an enhanced driver's license, must be made in a format approved by the department. Every application must be accompanied by payment of the proper fee. All applicants must sign the application and declare, under penalty of perjury, that the information and documentation presented in the application is true and correct. All applications requiring evidence of legal presence in the United States or United States citizenship must be signed in the presence of the person authorized to accept the application, or the signature on the application may be verified by a notary public.new text begin Every application must include the following statement: "Only citizens of the United States are eligible to vote. If you are not a citizen, you are not eligible to vote. Voting if you are not eligible to vote is a felony that is punishable by not more than five years imprisonment and a fine of not more than $10,000, or both. A felony conviction may lead to deportation in some instances."new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.06, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Noncompliant license or identification card; residence, lawful status. (a) A person who applies for a noncompliant driver's license or identification card: (1) must declare the applicant's residence address in Minnesota; and (2) deleted text begin is not requireddeleted text end new text begin must be askednew text end to demonstrate United States citizenship or lawful presence in the United States. new text begin (b) The commissioner or driver's license agent must record whether United States citizenship or lawful presence in the United States was demonstrated and, if so, which documents were provided. Data collected pursuant to this paragraph must only be used for the purpose of improving the accuracy of voter registration records under section 171.12, subdivision 7a. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end Minnesota Rules, part 7410.0410, or any successor rule, does not apply for a noncompliant driver's license or identification card. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end Nothing in this section allows the commissioner to issue a commercial driver's license to an applicant who does not demonstrate proof of citizenship or immigration status if required by federal law.